Missouri, session 2026, SB1568.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 208.080 and 208.156, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 208.080 and 208.156, to read as follows:
208.080. 1. Any applicant for or recipient of
benefits or services provided by law by the family support
division, children's division, [or] MO HealthNet division,
or Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit may appeal to
the director of the respective division or unit from a
decision in any of the following cases:
(1) If his or her right to make application for any
such benefits or services is denied; or
(2) If his or her application is disallowed in whole
or in part, or is not acted upon within a reasonable time
after it is filed; or
(3) If it is proposed to cancel or modify benefits or
services; or
(4) If he or she is adversely affected by any
determination of the family support division, children's
division, [or] MO HealthNet division, or Missouri Medicaid
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1568 2
audit and compliance unit in the administration of the
programs administered by such divisions or unit; or
(5) If a determination is made pursuant to subsection
2 of section 208.180 that payment of benefits on behalf of a
dependent child shall not be made to the relative with whom
he or she lives.
2. If a division or unit proposes to terminate or
modify the payment of benefits or the providing of services
to the recipient or a division or unit has terminated or
modified the payment of benefits or providing of services to
the recipient and the recipient appeals, the decision of the
director as to the eligibility of the recipient at the time
such action was proposed or taken shall be based on the
facts shown by the evidence presented at the hearing of the
appeal to have existed at the time such action to terminate
or modify was proposed or was taken.
3. In the case of a proposed action by the family
support division, children's division, [or] MO HealthNet
division, or Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit to
reduce, modify, or discontinue benefits or services to a
recipient, the recipient of such benefits or services shall
have ten days from the date of the mailing of notice of the
proposed action to reduce, modify, or discontinue benefits
or services within which to request an appeal to the
director of the division or unit. In the notice to the
recipient of such proposed action, the appropriate division
or unit shall notify the recipient of all his or her rights
of appeal under this section. Proper blank forms for appeal
to the director of the division or unit shall be furnished
by the appropriate division or unit to any aggrieved
recipient. Every such appeal to the director of the
division or unit shall be transmitted by the appropriate

SB 1568 3
division or unit immediately upon the same being filed with
the appropriate division or unit. If an appeal is
requested, benefits or services shall continue undiminished
or unchanged until such appeal is heard and a decision has
been rendered thereon, except that in an aid to families
with dependent children case the recipient may request that
benefits or services not be continued undiminished or
unchanged during the appeal.
4. When a case has been closed or modified and no
appeal was requested prior to closing or modification, the
recipient shall have ninety days from the date of closing or
modification to request an appeal to the director of the
division or unit. Each recipient who has not requested an
appeal prior to the closing or modification of his or her
case shall be notified at the time of such closing or
modification of his or her right to request an appeal during
this ninety-day period. Proper blank forms for requesting
an appeal to the director of the division or unit shall be
furnished by the appropriate division or unit to any
aggrieved applicant. Every such request made in any manner
for an appeal to the director of the division or unit shall
be transmitted by the appropriate division or unit to the
director of the division or unit immediately upon the same
being filed with the appropriate division or unit. If an
appeal is requested in the ninety-day period subsequent to
the closing or modification, benefits or services shall not
be continued at their prior level during the pendency of the
appeal.
5. In the case of a rejection of an application for
benefits or services, the aggrieved applicant shall have
ninety days from the date of the notice of the action in
which to request an appeal to the director of the division

SB 1568 4
or unit. In the rejection notice the applicant for benefits
or services shall be notified of all of his or her rights of
appeal under this section. Proper blank forms for
requesting an appeal to the director of the division or unit
shall be furnished by the appropriate division or unit to
any aggrieved applicant. Any such request made in any
manner for an appeal shall be transmitted by the appropriate
division or unit to the director of the division or unit,
immediately upon the same being filed with the appropriate
division or unit.
6. If the division or unit has rejected an application
for benefits or services and the applicant appeals, the
decision of the director as to the eligibility of the
applicant at the time such rejection was made shall be based
upon the facts shown by the evidence presented at the
hearing of the appeal to have existed at the time the
rejection was made.
7. The director of the division or unit shall give the
applicant for benefits or services or the recipient of
100 benefits or services reasonable notice of, and an
101 opportunity for, a fair hearing in the county of his or her
102 residence at the time the adverse action was taken. The
103 hearing shall be conducted by the director of the division
104 or unit or such director's designee. Every applicant or
105 recipient, on appeal to the director of the division or
106 unit, shall be entitled to be present at the hearing, in
107 person and by attorney or representative, and shall be
108 entitled to introduce into the record of such hearing any
109 and all evidence, by witnesses or otherwise, pertinent to
110 such applicant's or recipient's eligibility between the time
111 he or she applied for benefits or services and the time the
112 application was denied or the benefits or services were

SB 1568 5
113 terminated or modified, and all such evidence shall be taken
114 down, preserved, and shall become a part of the applicant's
115 or recipient's appeal record. Upon the record so made, the
116 director of the division or unit shall determine all
117 questions presented by the appeal, and shall make such
118 decision as to the granting of benefits or services as in
119 his or her opinion is justified and is in conformity with
120 the provisions of the law. The director shall clearly state
121 the reasons for his or her decision and shall include a
122 statement of findings of fact and conclusions of law
123 pertinent to the questions in issue.
124 8. All appeal requests may initially be made orally or
125 in any written form, but all such requests shall be
126 transcribed on forms furnished by the division or unit and
127 signed by the aggrieved applicant or recipient or his or her
128 representative prior to the commencement of the hearing.
208.156. 1. The family support division or the MO
HealthNet division shall provide for granting an opportunity
for a fair hearing under section 208.080 to any applicant or
recipient whose claim for medical assistance is denied or is
not acted upon with reasonable promptness.
2. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to
provide services for which benefit payments are authorized
under section 208.152 whose claim for reimbursement for such
services is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable
promptness shall be entitled to a hearing before the
administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 621.
3. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to
provide services for which benefit payments are authorized
under section 208.152 who is denied participation in any
program or programs established under the provisions of

SB 1568 6
chapter 208 shall be entitled to a hearing before the
administrative hearing commission pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 621.
4. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to
provide services for which benefit payments are authorized
under section 208.152 who is aggrieved by any rule or
regulation promulgated by the department of social services
or any division or unit therein shall be entitled to a
hearing before the administrative hearing commission
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 621.
5. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to
provide services for which benefit payments are authorized
under section 208.152 who is aggrieved by any rule or
regulation, contractual agreement, or decision, as provided
for in section 208.166, by the department of social services
or any division or unit therein shall be entitled to a
hearing before the administrative hearing commission
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 621.
6. No provider of service may file a petition for a
hearing before the administrative hearing commission unless
the amount for which he or she seeks reimbursement exceeds
five hundred dollars.
7. One or more providers of service as will fairly
insure adequate representation of others having similar
claims against the department of social services or any
division or unit therein may institute the hearing on behalf
of all in the class if there is a common question of law or
fact affecting the several rights and a common relief is
sought.
8. Any person authorized under section 208.153 to
provide services for which benefit payments are authorized
under section 208.152 and who is entitled to a hearing as

SB 1568 7
provided for in the preceding sections shall have thirty
days from the date of mailing or delivery of a decision of
the department of social services or its designated division
or unit in which to file his or her petition for review with
the administrative hearing commission except that claims of
less than five hundred dollars may be accumulated until they
total that sum and at which time the provider shall have
ninety days to file his or her petition.
9. When a person entitled to a hearing as provided for
in this section applies to the administrative hearing
commission for a stay order staying the actions of the
department of social services or its divisions or units, the
administrative hearing commission shall not grant such stay
order until after a full hearing on such application. The
application shall be advanced on the docket for immediate
hearing and determination. The person applying for such
stay order shall not be granted such stay order unless that
person shall show that immediate and irreparable injury,
loss, or damage will result if such stay order is denied, or
that such person has a reasonable likelihood of success upon
the merits of his or her claim; and provided further that no
stay order shall be issued without the person seeking such
order posting a bond in such sum as the administrative
hearing commission finds sufficient to protect and preserve
the interest of the department of social services or its
divisions or units. [In no event may the administrative
hearing commission grant such stay order where the claim
arises under a program or programs funded by federal funds
or by any combination of state and federal funds, unless it
is specified in writing by the financial section of the
appropriate federal agency that federal financial
participation will be continued under the stay order.]

SB 1568 8
10. The other provisions of this section
notwithstanding, a person receiving or providing benefits
shall have the right to bring an action in appealing from
the administrative hearing commission in the circuit court
of Cole County, Missouri, or the county of his or her
residence pursuant to section 536.050.
✓